Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.220

Salaries.

Each member of the council shall receive such compensation as may be provided by law to cities of the class to which it belongs. The city manager and other officers or assistants shall receive such salary or compensation as the council shall fix by ordinance and shall be payable at such times as the council may determine.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.220. Prior: (i) 1943 c 271 s 9, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-18, part. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 20; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-29.]